Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14A-114] Audits. The
administrator, or designated representative, shall have reasonable access to
any policyholder's payroll and employment records during regular working hours
to carry out audits of payroll reported, the number of employees on the
payroll, and other information necessary for the administration of this
article. [L 1996, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next